District of Columbia statutes.
29-707.01

Partner’s transferable interest.

A transferable interest is personal property.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(8)(A), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 701 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.